Nebraska, session 109, LB320.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 81-1430, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is amended
to read:
81-1430 (1) A task force is hereby established within the Nebraska
Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice for the purposes of
investigating and studying human trafficking, the methods for advertising human
trafficking services, and the victimization of individuals coerced to
participate in human trafficking. The task force terminates July 1, 2026.
(2) The task force shall examine the extent to which human trafficking is
prevalent in this state, the scope of efforts being taken to prevent human
trafficking from occurring, and the services available to victims of human
trafficking in this state. The task force shall utilize information and
research available from the Innocence Lost National Initiative. The task force
shall research and recommend a model of rehabilitative services for victims of
human trafficking that includes input from the areas of law enforcement, social
services, the legal profession, the judiciary, mental health, and immigration.
The task force shall also investigate the limitations upon victims who wish to
come forward and seek medical attention; investigate the potential to stop
human trafficking; and investigate the potential to promote recovery, to
protect families and children who may be profoundly impacted by such abuse, and
to save lives.
(3)(a) The Department of Labor shall develop or select informational
posters for placement around the state. The posters shall be in English,
Spanish, and any other language deemed appropriate by the department. The
posters shall include a toll-free telephone number a person may call for
assistance, preferably the National Human Trafficking Resource Center Hotline
(888)373-7888.
(b) Posters shall be placed in rest stops, strip clubs, and casinos, and
hotels and similar public lodging establishments. The department shall work
with local businesses and nonprofit entities associated with the prevention of
human trafficking to voluntarily place additional signs in high schools,
postsecondary educational institutions, gas stations, hotels, hospitals, health
care clinics, urgent care centers, airports, train stations, bus stations, and
other locations around the state deemed appropriate by the department.
(c) Prior to July 1, 2026, the department shall work with the task force
to carry out this subsection.
(4) The task force shall consist of the following members:
(a) The Attorney General or his or her designee;
(b) The executive director of the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement
and Criminal Justice;
(c) The Superintendent of Law Enforcement and Public Safety or his or her
designee;
(d) The Director of Correctional Services or his or her designee;
(e) The chief of police or director of public safety of a city of two
hundred thousand inhabitants or more as determined by the most recent federal
decennial census or the most recent revised certified count by the United
States Bureau of the Census;
(f) The chief of police or director of public safety of a city of less
than two hundred thousand inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal
decennial census or the most recent revised certified count by the United
States Bureau of the Census;
(g) A county sheriff;
(h) A county attorney;
(i) A county commissioner;
(j) A mayor or city manager;
(k) A person involved with the control or prevention of juvenile
delinquency;
(l) A person involved with the control or prevention of child abuse;
(m) The Commissioner of Education or his or her designee;
(n) The director of the Commission on Latino-Americans or his or her
designee; and
(o) Six members, at least three of whom shall be women, from the public at
large.
-1-

LB320 LB320
2026 2026
(5) The Governor shall appoint the members of the task force listed in
subdivisions (4)(e) through (l) and (o) of this section for terms as provided
in subsection (6) of this section. The membership of the task force shall
represent varying geographic areas and large and small political subdivisions.
One member from the public at large shall be a professional representing child
welfare, and one member of the public at large shall represent juvenile
pretrial diversion programs.
(6) The members of the task force appointed by the Governor shall serve
six-year terms, except that of the members first appointed, four shall serve
initial two-year terms, four shall serve initial four-year terms, and six shall
serve initial six-year terms from January 1 next succeeding their appointments.
Thereafter, all members shall serve six-year terms. A member may be reappointed
at the expiration of his or her term. Any vacancy occurring otherwise than by
expiration of a term shall be filled for the balance of the unexpired term in
the same manner as the original appointment.
(7) No member shall serve beyond the time when he or she holds the office,
employment, or status by reason of which he or she was initially eligible for
appointment. Any member of the task force appointed by the Governor may be
removed from the task force for cause upon notice and an opportunity to be
heard at a public hearing. One of the causes for removal shall be absence from
three regularly scheduled meetings of the task force during any six-month
period when the member has failed to advise the task force in advance of such
meeting that he or she will be absent and stating a reason therefor.
(8) The chairperson of the task force shall be designated by the Governor
to serve at the pleasure of the Governor. The chairperson shall be the chief
executive officer of the task force but may delegate such of his or her duties
to other members of the task force as may be authorized by the task force.
(9) Notwithstanding any provision of law, ordinance, or charter provision
to the contrary, membership on the task force shall not disqualify any member
from holding any other public office or employment or cause the forfeiture
thereof.
(10) The members of the task force shall serve on the task force without
compensation, but they shall be entitled to receive reimbursement for expenses
incurred incident to such service as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.
(11) Eleven members of the task force shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of any business or the exercise of any power of the task force. The
task force shall have the power to act by a majority of the members present at
any meeting at which a quorum is in attendance.
(12) Every July 1 and December 1 until July 1, 2026, the task force shall
report electronically to the Clerk of the Legislature the results of its
investigation and study and its recommendations, if any, together with drafts
of legislation necessary to carry its recommendations into effect by filing the
report with the clerk.
Sec. 2. Section 81-1431, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is amended to
read:
81-1431 (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that law enforcement
agencies, prosecutors, public defenders, judges, juvenile detention center
staff, and others involved in the juvenile justice system and the criminal
justice system and other relevant officials be provided mandatory training
regarding issues in human trafficking. Prior to July 1, 2026, the task force
established in section 81-1430 shall work with such agencies, persons, and
staff to develop a proper curriculum for the training and to determine how the
training should be provided. The determination and accompanying legislative
recommendations shall be made by December 1, 2012. Such training shall focus
on:
(a) State and federal law regarding human trafficking;
(b) Methods used in identifying victims of human trafficking who are
United States citizens and foreign nationals, including preliminary interview
techniques and appropriate questioning methods;
(c) Methods for prosecuting human traffickers;
(d) Methods of increasing effective collaboration with nongovernmental
organizations and other relevant social service organizations in the course of
investigating and prosecuting a human trafficking case;
(e) Methods for protecting the rights of victims of human trafficking,
taking into account the need to consider human rights and the special needs of
women and minor victims;
(f) The necessity of treating victims of human trafficking as crime
victims rather than as criminals; and
(g) Methods for promoting the safety and well-being of all victims of
human trafficking.
(2) Employees of hotels and similar public lodging establishments may be
provided training regarding issues in human trafficking. The Attorney General,
the Department of Labor, and hotels and similar public lodging establishments
may work together to approve such training and determine how such training
should be provided. Such training may include:
(a) The definition of human trafficking and the commercial exploitation of
children;
(b) Guidance on how to identify individuals at risk for human trafficking;
(c) Guidance on how to identify the signs of human trafficking and any
individual potentially engaged in human trafficking;
(d) Differences between labor trafficking and sex trafficking, specific to
the hotel and public lodging sector;
(e) Guidance on the role of hospitality employees in reporting and
-2-

LB320 LB320
2026 2026
responding to potential or suspected human trafficking; and
(f) The contact information for the Nebraska Human Trafficking Hotline
toll-free telephone number and text line and contact information for local law
enforcement.
(3) (2) Prior to July 1, 2026, the task force shall also seek the input
and participation of appropriate nongovernmental organizations and other
relevant organizations regarding the provision, preparation, and presentation
of the training called for in this section.
Sec. 3. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Hotel means a facility in which the public may, for a consideration,
obtain sleeping accommodations. Hotel includes hotels, motels, tourist homes,
campgrounds, courts, lodging houses, inns, state-operated hotels, and nonprofit
hotels but does not include hospitals, sanitariums, nursing homes, long-term
care facilities, or dormitories or facilities operated by an educational
institution and regularly used to house students; and
(b) Human trafficking means labor trafficking, labor trafficking of a
minor, sex trafficking, or sex trafficking of a minor as those terms are
defined in section 28-830.
(2) Any person, firm, or corporation that owns or operates a hotel or
similar public lodging establishment may:
(a) Provide to all employees of such hotel or public lodging establishment
within the State of Nebraska training on human trafficking that has been
approved pursuant to subsection (2) of section 81-1431;
(b) Implement procedures for the reporting of suspected human trafficking
to the Nebraska Human Trafficking Hotline or to a local enforcement agency; and
(c) Implement a human trafficking prevention policy for employees of the
hotel or establishment within the State of Nebraska.
(3) An owner, operator, or employee of a hotel or similar public lodging
establishment who implements the training and policies as prescribed in
subsection (2) of this section shall not be liable for any act or omission
arising out of or related to human trafficking committed by a third party
occurring at such hotel or establishment unless the owner, operator, or
employee of the hotel or establishment knowingly assists the commission of
human trafficking, or has failed to act in a reasonable manner.
(4) The Department of Labor may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
to carry out this section.
Sec. 4. Original sections 81-1430 and 81-1431, Revised Statutes
Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-3-